src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/Num-njolj_gt-norm.yaml
  Numeral - нёль: # Ordinary numerals - full paradigm including MNW 'four/neljä'
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: нёль
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Acc: [нёль, нёльсӧ]
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Gen: нёльлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Abl: нёльлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Dat: нёльлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ins: нёльӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Com: нёлькӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Car: нёльтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Cns: нёльла
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ine: нёльын
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ela: нёльысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ill: нёльӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Apr: нёльлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Egr: нёльсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Prl: нёльӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Prl+Tra: нёльӧдті
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ter: нёльӧдз
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: нёльӧй
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: нёльӧйлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: нёльӧйлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: нёльӧйлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: нёльӧс
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: нёльнам
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Com+PxSg1: нёльӧйкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Car+PxSg1: нёльӧйтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: нёльӧйла
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: нёлям
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: нёльсьым
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: нёлям
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: нёльӧйлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: нёльӧйсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: нёльӧдым
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ter+PxSg1: нёльӧдзым
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: нёльыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: нёльыдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: нёльыдлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: нёльыдлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: нёльтӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: нёльнад
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Com+PxSg2: нёльыдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Car+PxSg2: нёльыдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: нёльыдла
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: нёляд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: нёльсьыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: нёляд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: нёльыдлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: нёльыдсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: нёльӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ter+PxSg2: нёльӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: нёльыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: нёльыслӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: нёльыслысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: нёльыслы
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: нёльсӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: нёльнас
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Com+PxSg3: нёльыскӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Car+PxSg3: нёльыстӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: нёльысла
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: нёляс
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: нёльсьыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: нёляс
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: нёльыслань
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: нёльыссянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: нёльӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ter+PxSg3: нёльӧдзыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: нёльным
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: нёльнымлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: нёльнымлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: нёльнымлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: нёльнымӧс
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: нёльнаным
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Com+PxPl1: нёльнымкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Car+PxPl1: нёльнымтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: нёльнымла
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: нёляным
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: нёльсьыным
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: нёляным
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: нёльнымлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: нёльнымсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: нёльӧдным
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ter+PxPl1: нёльӧдзным
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: нёльныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: нёльныдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: нёльныдлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: нёльныдлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: нёльнытӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: нёльнаныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Com+PxPl2: нёльныдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Car+PxPl2: нёльныдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: нёльныдла
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: нёляныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: нёльсьыныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: нёляныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: нёльныдлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: нёльныдсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: нёльӧдныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ter+PxPl2: нёльӧдзныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: нёльныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: нёльныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: нёльныслысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: нёльныслы
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: нёльнысӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: нёльнаныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Com+PxPl3: нёльныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Car+PxPl3: нёльныстӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: нёльнысла
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: нёляныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: нёльсьыныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: нёляныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: нёльныслань
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: нёльныссянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: нёльӧдныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Sg+Ter+PxPl3: нёльӧдзныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Nom: нёльяс
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Acc: [нёльяс, нёльяссӧ]
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Gen: нёльяслӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Abl: нёльяслысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Dat: нёльяслы
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ins: нёльясӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Com: нёльяскӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Car: нёльястӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Cns: нёльясла
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ine: нёльясын
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ela: нёльясысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ill: нёльясӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Apr: нёльяслань
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Egr: нёльяссянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Prl: нёльясӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ter: нёльясӧдз
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: нёльясӧй
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: нёльясӧйлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: нёльясӧйлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: нёльясӧйлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: нёльясӧс
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: нёльяснам
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Com+PxSg1: нёльясӧйкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Car+PxSg1: нёльясӧйтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Cns+PxSg1: нёльясӧйла
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: нёльясам
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: нёльяссьым
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: нёльясам
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: нёльясӧйлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Egr+PxSg1: нёльясӧйсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: нёльясӧдым
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ter+PxSg1: нёльясӧдзым
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: нёльясыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: нёльясыдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: нёльясыдлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: нёльясыдлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: нёльястӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: нёльяснад
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Com+PxSg2: нёльясыдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Car+PxSg2: нёльясыдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Cns+PxSg2: нёльясыдла
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: нёльясад
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: нёльяссьыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: нёльясад
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: нёльясыдлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: нёльясыдсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: нёльясӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: нёльясӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: нёльясыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: нёльясыслӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: нёльясыслысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: нёльясыслы
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: нёльяссӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: нёльяснас
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Com+PxSg3: нёльясыскӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Car+PxSg3: нёльясыстӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: нёльясысла
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: нёльясас
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: нёльяссьыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: нёльясас
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: нёльясыслань
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: нёльясыссянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: нёльясӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: нёльясӧдзыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: нёльясным
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: нёльяснымлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: нёльяснымлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: нёльяснымлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: нёльяснымӧс
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: нёльяснаным
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Com+PxPl1: нёльяснымкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Car+PxPl1: нёльяснымтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: нёльяснымла
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: нёльясаным
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: нёльяссьыным
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: нёльясаным
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: нёльяснымлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: нёльяснымсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: нёльясӧдным
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: нёльясӧдзным
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: нёльясныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: нёльясныдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: нёльясныдлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: нёльясныдлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: нёльяснытӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: нёльяснаныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Com+PxPl2: нёльясныдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Car+PxPl2: нёльясныдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: нёльясныдла
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: нёльясаныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: нёльяссьыныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: нёльясаныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: нёльясныдлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: нёльясныдсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: нёльясӧдныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: нёльясӧдзныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: нёльясныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: нёльясныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: нёльясныслысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: нёльясныслы
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: нёльяснысӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: нёльяснаныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Com+PxPl3: нёльясныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Car+PxPl3: нёльясныстӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: нёльяснысла
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: нёльясаныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: нёльяссьыныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: нёльясаныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: нёльясныслань
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: нёльясныслань
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: нёльясныссянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: нёльясӧдныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: нёльясӧдзныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: нёльӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Acc: [нёльӧд, нёльӧдсӧ]
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Gen: нёльӧдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Abl: нёльӧдлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Dat: нёльӧдлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Ins: нёльӧдӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Com: нёльӧдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Car: нёльӧдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Cns: нёльӧдла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Ine: нёльӧдын
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Ela: нёльӧдысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Ill: нёльӧдӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Apr: нёльӧдлань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Egr: нёльӧдсянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Prl: нёльӧдӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Prl+Tra: нёльӧдӧдті
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Ter: нёльӧдӧдз
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: нёльӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: нёльӧдыдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: нёльӧдыдлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: нёльӧдыдлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: нёльӧдтӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: нёльӧднад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Com+PxSg2: нёльӧдыдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Car+PxSg2: нёльӧдыдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: нёльӧдыдла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: нёльӧдад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: нёльӧдсьыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: нёльӧдад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: нёльӧдыдлань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: нёльӧдыдсянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: нёльӧдӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Ter+PxSg2: нёльӧдӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: нёльӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: нёльӧдыслӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: нёльӧдыслысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: нёльӧдыслы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: нёльӧдсӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: нёльӧднас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Com+PxSg3: нёльӧдыскӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Car+PxSg3: нёльӧдтӧгыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: нёльӧдысла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: нёльӧдас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: нёльӧдсьыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: нёльӧдас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: нёльӧдыслань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: нёльӧдыссянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: нёльӧдӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Sg+Ter+PxSg3: нёльӧдӧдзыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Nom: нёльӧдъяс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Acc: [нёльӧдъяс, нёльӧдъяссӧ]
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Gen: нёльӧдъяслӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Abl: нёльӧдъяслысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Dat: нёльӧдъяслы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Ins: нёльӧдъясӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Com: нёльӧдъяскӧд
